Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Article 5. Administrative Director.

Sec. 22.20.300.
Administrative director.

The chief justice of the supreme court shall, with the approval of the supreme court, appoint an administrative director to serve at the pleasure of the supreme court and to supervise the administrative operations of the Alaska Court System.

History.

(§ 15 ch 50 SLA 1959; am § 31 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 28 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

22.05.150

. Renumbered in 1998.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “Alaska Court System” for “judicial system.”

Sec. 22.20.310.
Court system report.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall, not later than March 15 of each year, make available to the public and file with the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives a report regarding the Alaska Court System. The report must include

a profile of the Alaska Court System and its justices, judges, and magistrates;

a summary description of the administration of the court system, including detailed descriptions of its facilities, programs, and personnel;

average, mean, minimum, and maximum time periods between initial receipt and final disposition of cases classified by courts and by each justice, judge, and magistrate;

information identifying each justice, judge, or magistrate who has had salary withheld under the authority of AS

22.05.140(b)

, AS

22.07.090(b)

, AS

22.10.190(b)

, or AS

22.15.220(c)

and the number of times and the time periods of the occurrences;

other information and data relevant to aiding the public and the legislature in understanding the organization, administration, caseload, disposition of cases, and accomplishments of the court system;

the travel expenses and per diem for each justice, judge, or magistrate for the previous calendar year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 2001; am § 29 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, inserted “of the Alaska Court System” near the beginning of the first paragraph.

Sec. 22.20.320.
Information systems guidelines and plan.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall establish information systems guidelines and prepare a short-range and long-range information systems plan for the court system. The guidelines and plan must be consistent with the telecommunications information guidelines and plan adopted by the commissioner under AS

44.21.350

—

44.21.390

and must be adapted to the special needs of the judicial branch as determined by the administrator of the Alaska Court System.

History.

(E.O. No. 113 § 2 (2005); am § 30 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.21.360; renumbered in 2005.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” near the beginning and at the end of the section.